Massachusetts, session 194th, H2177.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 1 - Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary the Secretary of 
Labor and Workforce Development, in consultation with the Division of Marine Fisheries, is 
hereby authorized and directed to analyze the economic disruption and harm to the financial 
stability of those engaged in commercial fishing in the Commonwealth that results from the 
inability to earn income as a result of state and federal regulatory actions including but not 
limited to area closures, gear restrictions, and time limitations, and to develop a plan to mitigate 
such harm through mechanisms such as modifications to the state's unemployment insurance 
system to take into account the particular circumstances resulting from such regulatory actions. 

of 2 9  Section 2 - In carrying out the provisions of section 1 the Secretary shall take into 
account the economic hardship occurring as a result of seasonal closures in the commercial 
lobster fishery for the purpose of preventing harm to North Atlantic Right Whales, in addition to 
other seasonal closures presently in place or which may occur in the future.  
Section 3 - The Secretary shall file any plan developed pursuant to this act, together with 
any legislative recommendations to carry it out, with the clerks of the House and Senate not later 
than April 1, 2026.